Missouri, session 2026, HB3137.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 167, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 167.1002, to read as follows:
167.1002. 1. At least twice during each school year, the school board of each
school district and the governing body of each charter school shall offer to each student
who is at least seventeen years and six months of age the opportunity to register to vote
in accordance with the provisions of this section.
2. A school district or charter school shall allow each student who is at least
seventeen years and six months of age to register to vote during school hours on the
fourth Tuesday in September of each year, or on the next available school day if school is
not in session on that day.
3. A school district or charter school shall coordinate with the local election
authority in whose jurisdiction such district or school is located to organize a second
opportunity to allow each student who is at least seventeen years and six months of age
to register to vote during school hours. Such opportunity shall occur later than the date
provided in subsection 2 of this section and shall be conducted by the local election
authority.
4. The secretary of state shall prepare informational materials regarding voter
registration to be distributed at each voter registration activity conducted pursuant to
the provisions of this section.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3137 2
5. Each school district and charter school shall file a report regarding voter
registration activities conducted pursuant to the provisions of this section with the
department of elementary and secondary education by December thirty-first of each
year.
✔